Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-3222
Violations of act; enforcement actions.

Whenever, in the judgment of the board, any person has engaged in or is about to engage in any acts or practices which constitute or will constitute a violation of the Nebraska Appraisal Management Company Registration Act, the Attorney General may maintain an action in the name of the State of Nebraska in the district court of the county in which such violation or threatened violation occurred to abate and temporarily and permanently enjoin such acts and practices and to enforce compliance with the act. The Attorney General shall not be required to give any bond nor shall any court costs be adjudged against the Attorney General.

Laws 2018, LB17, § 20.
July 19, 2018